Tennessee, session 114, HB1854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-107, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) It is an offense for a person to adulterate any food product or liquid that is
manufactured, marketed, grown, or produced for human consumption or any
pharmaceutical product that is designed, marketed, or prescribed for the diagnosis or
treatment of a disease or medical condition by placing in, mixing with, or adding to the
product or liquid, any object, liquid, powder, or other substance with the intent to cause
the following to a user of the product or liquid:
(1) Involuntary intoxication;
(2) Bodily injury;
(3) Serious bodily injury; or
(4) Death.
(b)
(1) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause
involuntary intoxication is a Class D felony.
(2) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause bodily
injury is a Class C felony.
(3) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause serious
bodily injury or death is a Class B felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1854
009644
- 1 -